Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 18
SAFETY PATROLS

Section.

33-1801. School safety patrols. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 49-652.

§ 33-1802. Purchase of uniforms, equipment, insurance. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 49-652.

§ 33-1803. Failure to obey safety patrol member unlawful. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 49-652.